Georgia, session 2025_26, HB585.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Title 33 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to insurance, is amended in
Chapter 7, relating to kinds of insurance, limits of risks, and reinsurance, by adding a new
Code section to read as follows:
"33-7-16.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term:
H. B. 585
- 1 -

LC 52 0785
(1) 'Excluded driver' means any named individual expressly excluded from coverage
under a motor vehicle insurance policy.
(2) 'Motor vehicle insurance policy' means an automobile liability policy or motor
vehicle liability policy issued, delivered, or issued for delivery in this state to the owner
of a vehicle which provides at least the minimum bodily injury, death, and property
damage liability coverage as required by Code Section 33-7-11.
(b) An insurer may exclude a named individual from coverage under a motor vehicle
insurance policy, provided that such insurer includes a designation that identifies such
named individual as an excluded driver in the proof of required minimum insurance
coverage under Code Section 40-6-10.
(c) The Commissioner shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary to implement the
provisions of this Code section."
SECTION 2.
Title 40 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to motor vehicles and traffic, is
amended in Chapter 6, relating to uniform rules of the road, by revising paragraph (6) of
subsection (a) and subsection (b) of Code Section 40-6-10, relating to insurance requirements
for operation of motor vehicles generally, as follows:
"(6) If a law enforcement officer of this state determines that the owner or operator of a
motor vehicle subject to the provisions of this Code section does not have proof or
evidence of required minimum insurance coverage or that the operator of such motor
vehicle is an excluded driver under the motor vehicle insurance policy for such vehicle
and does not have other proof of insurance, the arresting officer shall issue a uniform
traffic citation for operating a motor vehicle without proof of insurance. If the court or
arresting officer determines that the operator is not the owner, then a uniform traffic
citation may be issued to the owner for authorizing the operation of a motor vehicle
without proof of insurance."
H. B. 585
- 2 -

LC 52 0785
"(b) An owner or any other person who knowingly operates or knowingly authorizes
another to operate a motor vehicle without effective insurance on such vehicle or without
an approved plan of self-insurance or an operator of a motor vehicle who is an excluded
driver under the motor vehicle insurance policy for such vehicle and who does not have
other effective insurance shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof,
shall be subject to a fine of not less than $200.00 nor more than $1,000.00 or imprisonment
for not more than 12 months, or both. An operator of a motor vehicle shall not be guilty
of a violation of this Code section if such operator maintains a policy of motor vehicle
insurance which extends coverage to any vehicle the operator may drive. An owner or
operator of a motor vehicle shall not be issued a citation by a law enforcement officer for
a violation of this Code section if the sole basis for issuance of such a citation is that the
law enforcement officer is unable to obtain insurance coverage information from the
records of the Department of Revenue."
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 585
- 3 -